Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20187-204
Legal Education
for Public Service and Rural
Practice Loan Repayment Assistance Board;
created; members.

The Legal Education for Public
Service and Rural Practice Loan
Repayment Assistance Board
is created. The board shall consist of the director of Legal Aid of Nebraska,
the deans of Creighton School of Law and the University of Nebraska College
of Law, a student from each law school selected by the dean of the law school, at least one of whom intends to work for
a tax-exempt charitable organization primarily doing public legal service
and at least one of whom is from or intends to practice in a designated legal
profession shortage area, a member of the Nebraska State Bar Association who practices in a designated legal profession
shortage area selected by the president of the association, and
the chief counsel of the Commission on Public Advocacy.

Laws 2008, LB1014, § 22;

Laws 2014, LB907, § 4.